Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.120

Records required at each certified feed lot.

The licensee shall maintain sufficient records as required by the director at each certified feed lot, if said licensee operates more than one certified feed lot.

[ 1991 c 109 s 13; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 12.]